Maryland, session 2026, SB0766.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Tax – General
1–401.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Covered enforcement action” means an enforcement action, INCLUDING A
JUDICIAL OR ADMINISTRATIVE ACTION, brought by the Comptroller, THE ATTORNEY
GENERAL, OR A STATE AGENCY under this OR ANY OTHER article that concerns:
(1) (i) the [State and county income] tax liability of an individual
taxpayer or a couple that is married and files jointly whose federal adjusted gross income
is at least $250,000; or
(ii) the [State and county] tax liability of a business, including those
persons who are jointly and severally liable for the [State] tax liability of a business under
this OR ANY OTHER article, the annual gross receipts or sales of which are at least
$2,000,000; and
(2) taxes in dispute exceeding $250,000.
(c) “Original information” means information that:
(1) is derived from the independent knowledge or analysis of a
whistleblower;
(2) is not known, AS APPLICABLE, to the Comptroller, THE ATTORNEY
GENERAL, OR A STATE AGENCY from any other source, unless the whistleblower is the
original source of the information;
(3) is not exclusively derived from an allegation made in a judicial or
administrative hearing, in a governmental report, hearing, audit, or investigation or from
the news media, unless the whistleblower is a source of the information; and
(4) is provided to the Comptroller in a sworn affidavit for the first time on
or after October 1, 2021.
[(d) “Related action” means any judicial or administrative action brought by a
State or local agency or entity based on the original information provided by a
whistleblower to the Comptroller under this subtitle.]

SENATE BILL 766 3
[(e)] (D) (1) “Whistleblower” means an individual or entity who provides, or
two or more individuals or entities acting jointly who provide, in accordance with this
subtitle, information to the Comptroller in a sworn affidavit relating to a violation of [State
tax] law THAT IMPOSES A TAX UNDER THIS OR ANY OTHER ARTICLE, including a rule
or regulation, that has occurred, is ongoing, or is about to occur.
(2) “Whistleblower” includes an individual who provides information to a
law enforcement agency before providing the information to the Comptroller.
1–401.1.
THIS SUBTITLE APPLIES ONLY TO A COVERED ENFORCEMENT ACTION FOR
WHICH THE COMPTROLLER, THE ATTORNEY GENERAL, OR A STATE AGENCY IS
AUTHORIZED TO BRING IN THE ENFORCEMENT OF A TAX THAT IS:
(1) IMPOSED UNDER THIS OR ANY OTHER ARTICLE; AND
(2) COLLECTED BY OR PAID TO THE STATE.
1–402.
(a) Subject to the limitations of this subtitle and except as provided in subsection
[(b)] (C) of this section, a whistleblower who voluntarily provides original information to
the Comptroller in a sworn affidavit that, because of the original information, results in a
final assessment in a covered enforcement action[, or a successful outcome against a
taxpayer in a related action,] shall be entitled to receive a monetary award of at least 15%
but not exceeding 30% of the taxes, penalties, and interest collected through the
enforcement action [or related action].
(B) (1) IF A WHISTLEBLOWER PROVIDES ORIGINAL INFORMATION TO THE
COMPTROLLER INVOLVING A TAX FOR WHICH THE ATTORNEY GENERAL OR A STATE
AGENCY IS AUTHORIZED TO BRING A COVERED ENFORCEMENT ACTION, THE
COMPTROLLER SHALL PROVIDE THE ORIGINAL INFORMATION TO THE ATTORNEY
GENERAL OR THE STATE AGENCY, AS APPLICABLE.
(2) IF, BECAUSE OF A WHISTLEBLOWER’S ORIGINAL INFORMATION,
THE ATTORNEY GENERAL OR A STATE AGENCY BRINGS A COVERED ENFORCEMENT
ACTION THAT RESULTS IN A FINAL ASSESSMENT, THE ATTORNEY GENERAL OR THE
STATE AGENCY SHALL PROMPTLY PROVIDE TO THE COMPTROLLER INFORMATION
PERTAINING TO THE FINAL ASSESSMENT FOR PURPOSES OF MAKING A
DETERMINATION UNDER THIS SUBTITLE CONCERNING AN AWARD.
[(b)] (C) A whistleblower who provides information to the Comptroller in a
sworn affidavit that is related to original information previously reported to the
Comptroller by another whistleblower who is eligible for an award under subsection (a) of

SENATE BILL 766
this section may not be entitled to an award unless the information provided by the
whistleblower materially adds to the information previously reported to the Comptroller.
[(c)] (D) If two or more whistleblowers are eligible for an award under subsection
(a) of this section arising out of the same covered enforcement action [or related action]:
(1) the total award may not exceed 30% of the taxes, penalties, and interest
collected through the enforcement action [or related action]; and
(2) the Comptroller shall determine the allocation of the award among the
eligible whistleblowers.
1–403.
(a) (1) The determination of ELIGIBILITY FOR AND the amount of an award
made in accordance with § 1–402 of this subtitle shall be:
(I) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED UNDER ITEM (II) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH, solely in the discretion of the Comptroller; OR
(II) WITH RESPECT TO ELIGIBILITY OF A WHISTLEBLOWER FOR
AN AWARD UNDER THIS SUBTITLE FOR PROVIDING ORIGINAL INFORMATION
REGARDING TAX LIABILITY UNDER ANOTHER ARTICLE, SOLELY IN THE DISCRETION
OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL OR STATE AGENCY AUTHORIZED TO BRING A COVERED
ENFORCEMENT ACTION BASED ON THAT ORIGINAL INFORMATION.
(2) In determining the amount of the award, the Comptroller shall
consider:
(i) the significance of the information provided by the whistleblower
to the success of the covered enforcement action [or related action];
(ii) the degree of assistance provided by the whistleblower and any
legal representative of the whistleblower in the covered enforcement action [or related
action];
(iii) the amount of the unpaid taxes owed the State that may be
recovered under the covered enforcement action [or related action];
(iv) the interest of the State in deterring violations of this AND ANY
OTHER article and promoting the reporting by whistleblowers of information relating to
those violations; and
(v) any additional relevant factors that the Comptroller may
establish by regulation.

SENATE BILL 766 5
(b) An award may not be provided to a whistleblower if the Comptroller
determines that the whistleblower:
(1) is, or was at the time that the whistleblower acquired the original
information provided to the Comptroller, a member, an officer, or an employee of a federal,
state, or local law enforcement agency responsible for the enforcement of tax–related
matters;
(2) was convicted of a criminal violation related to the covered enforcement
action [or related action] for which the whistleblower otherwise could receive an award
under this section;
(3) could have been convicted of a criminal violation or held personally
liable for the tax liability related to the covered enforcement action [or related action] for
which the whistleblower otherwise could receive an award under this section had the
whistleblower provided the original information before the expiration of any applicable
statute of limitations for prosecution or assessment of the whistleblower; or
(4) when submitting information under this subtitle, knowingly and
willfully made false, fictitious, or fraudulent statements to the Comptroller or used any
false writing or document knowing the writing or document contained a false, fictitious, or
fraudulent statement or entry.
(c) (1) A determination of the Comptroller, ATTORNEY GENERAL, OR
STATE AGENCY under this section may be challenged in accordance with Title 10, Subtitle
2 of the State Government Article if the challenge is brought within 45 days of the date of
the determination.
(2) In bringing a challenge in accordance with paragraph (1) of this
subsection, the whistleblower may not challenge:
(i) the decision to conduct or the method of conducting an
investigation arising from the original information provided by the whistleblower;
(ii) the amount of any unpaid taxes, penalties, or interest due to the
State arising from the original information provided by the whistleblower;
(iii) the result of a covered enforcement action [or related action]
arising from the original information provided by the whistleblower; or
(iv) any settlement between the State and a person having a tax
liability that arises from the original information provided by the whistleblower.
(3) A HEARING UNDER THIS SUBSECTION SHALL BE CONDUCTED BY
THE OFFICE OF ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGS.

SENATE BILL 766
1–405.
(a) A current or prospective employer, contractor, or agent may not discharge,
demote, suspend, threaten, or harass, directly or indirectly, or in any other manner
discriminate or retaliate against an individual in the terms and conditions of employment
because of a lawful act done by that individual:
(1) in providing information to the Comptroller or a law enforcement
agency concerning a possible violation of [State tax] law THAT IMPOSES A TAX UNDER
THIS OR ANY OTHER ARTICLE, including a rule or regulation, that has occurred, is
ongoing, or is about to occur;
(2) in initiating, testifying in, or assisting in an investigation or [judicial or
administrative] COVERED ENFORCEMENT action [of the Comptroller or law enforcement
agency or a related action];
(3) in reporting a violation of this [title] OR ANY OTHER ARTICLE to
another governmental entity or to a director, supervisor, or compliance officer of the
employer, contractor, or agent; or
(4) in refusing or declining any agreement that would provide for
arbitration of claims arising under this OR ANY OTHER article.
1–406.
Nothing in this subtitle may be construed to:
(1) preempt, limit, or restrict the authority or discretion of the Comptroller
to investigate or enforce a violation of this OR ANY OTHER article;
(2) limit any power otherwise granted in this article or other laws to the
Comptroller, Attorney General, State agencies, or local governments to investigate or
enforce possible violations of this OR ANY OTHER article;
(3) authorize a private right of action involving a violation of this OR ANY
OTHER article, except as specifically authorized in this OR ANOTHER article;
(4) prevent or prohibit a person from voluntarily disclosing any
information concerning a violation of this OR ANY OTHER article to any law enforcement
agency or self–regulatory organization; or
(5) preempt, limit, restrict, or otherwise affect the rights and rewards
provided to qui tam plaintiffs under the Maryland False Claims Act.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:

SENATE BILL 766 7
(a) This Act shall be construed to apply retroactively and shall be applied to and
interpreted to affect the provision of original information by a whistleblower in a sworn
affidavit to the Comptroller on or after October 1, 2021.
(b) (1) This subsection applies to a whistleblower who voluntarily provided
original information to the Comptroller in a sworn affidavit before the effective date of this
Act that pertains to a tax that is imposed under an article of the Annotated Code of
Maryland other than the Tax – General Article.
(2) If the original information provided by the whistleblower results in a
successful outcome against a taxpayer in a covered enforcement action, as defined under §
1–401 of the Tax – General Article, as enacted by Section 1 of this Act, the whistleblower
may be entitled to receive a monetary award in accordance with § 1–402 of the Tax –
General Article, notwithstanding the thresholds under § 1–401(b) of the Tax – General
Article.
(3) If the whistleblower was determined to be ineligible for a monetary
award under Title 1, Subtitle 4 of the Tax – General Article before the effective date of this
Act, the whistleblower may appeal the determination in accordance with § 1–403(c) of the
Tax – General Article, as enacted by Section 1 of this Act, if the appeal is brought within
45 days after the effective date of this Act.
SECTION 2. 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.